Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1607.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6303(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6303. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Concerns a military family." In a report:(1) an alleged perpetrator of abuse is a service member, spouse of a service member or child of a service member; or(2) an alleged victim of abuse is a child of a service 1234567891011121314151617181920 member.* * *"Family Advocacy Program." The program established by the United States Department of Defense to address child abuse and neglect, problematic sexual behavior in children and youth and domestic abuse in military families . * * *"Service member." A person serving in the armed forces of the United States or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States or the Pennsylvania National Guard.* * *Section 2. Section 6313(b) of Title 23 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6313. Reporting procedure.* * *(b) Contents of report.--A written report of suspected child abuse, which may be submitted electronically, shall include the following information, if known:* * *(5.1) Whether the report concerns a military family and, if so, any necessary explanatory information.* * *Section 3. Sections 6334(a) and (b), 6334.1(4) and 6335(a) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 6334. Disposition of complaints received.(a) Receipt of reports by county agencies and law enforcement.--After ensuring the immediate safety of the child and any other child in the child's home, a county agency or law enforcement official that receives a report of suspected child abuse shall immediately notify the department of the report. If 20250HB1607PN1922 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the report is an oral report by telephone, the county agency or law enforcement official shall attempt to collect as much of the information listed in section [6313(c)] 6313(b) (relating to reporting procedure) as possible and shall submit the information to the department within 48 hours through a report in writing or by electronic technologies.(b) Receipt of reports by department and referral to county agency; notification of Family Advocacy Program representative.--The department shall immediately transmit an oral notice or a notice by electronic technologies to the county agency of the county where the suspected child abuse is alleged to have occurred. If the report concerns a military family, the department shall also notify the Family Advocacy Program representative for the Commonwealth and the designated Family Advocacy Program representative of the assigned military installation. The notice shall contain the following information:(1) That a report of suspected child abuse by a perpetrator has been received.(2) The substance of the report.(3) The existence in the Statewide database of a prior report or a current investigation or assessment concerning a subject of the report.* * *§ 6334.1. Responsibility for investigation.The department shall establish procedures regarding the following different responses to address suspected child abuse and protective services depending on the person's allegedly committing the suspected child abuse or causing a child to be in need of protective services:20250HB1607PN1922 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(4) If a child is alleged to be in need of other protective services, the appropriate county agency, in coordination with the appropriate Family Advocacy Program representative, if applicable, shall assess the needs of the child as provided in this chapter.§ 6335. Access to information in Statewide database.(a) Request for information.--A county agency, Family Advocacy Program representative or law enforcement official shall use the Statewide toll-free telephone number, or any manner prescribed by the department, to determine the existence of any prior reports involving a subject of the report. If the Statewide database contains information related to a report or a pending investigation or assessment concerning a subject of the report, the department shall immediately convey this information to the county agency, Family Advocacy Program representative or law enforcement official.* * *Section 4. Sections 6336(a) and 6340(a) of Title 23 are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6336. Information in Statewide database.(a) Information authorized.--The Statewide database shall include and shall be limited to the following information:* * *(6.1) Whether the report concerns a military family and, if so, any necessary explanatory information.* * *§ 6340. Release of information in confidential reports.(a) General rule.--Reports specified in section 6339 (relating to confidentiality of reports) shall only be made 20250HB1607PN1922 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available to:* * *(19) If the report concerns a military family, the Family Advocacy Program representative for the Commonwealth or to the designated Family Advocacy Program representative for the assigned military installation.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB1607PN1922 - 5 - 12345678